District of Columbia statutes.
5-125.01

Intent of Council.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds and declares that the use of restraints generally known as chokeholds by law enforcement officers constitutes the use of lethal force, and that the unrestricted use of force presents an unnecessary danger to the public. These conclusions are based upon the testimony presented at the police oversight hearing conducted by the Committee on the Judiciary on February 23, 1984. During the hearing, statistics were revealed indicating that there have been 2 civilian deaths in as many years caused by an officer’s use of the chokehold. Therefore, it is the intent of the Council in the enactment of this subchapter to specify the circumstances and procedures under which these restraints shall be permitted and to classify the chokehold as a service weapon.

Jan. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-77, § 2, 32 DCR 6497

History

1981 Ed., § 4-188.

Prior Codifications

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 5 of D.C. Law 6-77 provided that the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 15 of Title 1.

Editor's Notes